Hawaii statutes.
[§312-4.5] Disposition of fines and related
income. Unless otherwise provided by law, income from the operation of
libraries that are financially supported by the State shall be deposited with
the director of finance to the credit of the general fund; provided that moneys
or properties donated for library use and patrons' deposits shall be deposited
and accounted for in accordance with rules adopted by the comptroller. [L
1994, c 57, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next